Vermont, session 2025-2026, H367.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. FINDINGS
The General Assembly finds the following:
(1) That the Olympic host selection process has been reformed in recent
years to reduce the cost of hosting and to make the Olympic Games
organization more sustainable. According to the International Olympic
Committee:
VT LEG #379900 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.367
2025 Page 2 of 6
(A) Olympic hosts must maximize the use of existing and temporary
venues and build new ones only if there is a long-term legacy need. Events
can be located in more than one city, region, or country.
(B) Olympic projects, or bids, are assessed according to several
elements, including how well they fit with existing regional and national
development plans, in addition to the long-term strategic goals of the
Olympics. Any project shall have strong public and political support and be
aligned with local long-term socioeconomic development plans.
(C) Each potential host should focus on developing a climate-
responsible project that will create lasting community benefits.
(2) That climate change has begun to impact Vermont with less snow,
more rain, and landslides forcing a reconsideration of the way the State’s land
is used. Climate disasters especially affect the public health and economic
benefits of the State’s recreation industry. Tourism in Vermont is a three-
billion-dollar industry that supports over 30,000 jobs in Vermont, or 10 percent
of Vermont’s workforce. The Vermont Department of Tourism and Marketing
(VDTM) appreciates the importance of cultivating the international tourism
market. There are a variety of ways that VDTM targets international
audiences, including having representation on the ground in key markets,
hosting international media in Vermont, and meeting with domestic receptive
tour operators.
VT LEG #379900 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.367
2025 Page 3 of 6
(3) In the face of climate change, the General Assembly must make
decisions about how to invest in sustainable and resilient infrastructure in our
regional planning, land use, and economic development. As the State adapts to
meet the great challenges of life on Earth in the 21st century, we can promote a
more sustainable, equitable, and resilient way of life here and also across the
planet through the process of hosting the Olympic Games.
Sec. 2. VERMONT OLYMPICS TASK FORCE
(a) Creation. There is created the Vermont Olympics Task Force to prepare
and present a proposal to the International Olympic Committee and the U.S.
Olympic and Paralympic Committee about the feasibility of Vermont hosting
the Games of the Olympiad, the Olympic Winter Games, or the Summer or
Winter Youth Olympic Games.
(b) Membership. The Task Force shall be composed of the following
members:
(1) one current member of the House of Representatives, who shall be
appointed by the Speaker of the House;
(2) one current member of the Senate, who shall be appointed by the
Committee on Committees;
(3) the current member representing Vermont in the U.S. House of
Representatives or designee;
(4) the State Treasurer or designee;
VT LEG #379900 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.367
2025 Page 4 of 6
(5) one person representing a Vermont Regional Planning Commission,
who shall be appointed by the Chair of the Vermont Association of Planning
and Development Agencies;
(6) one person who owns and operates a small business with experience
in the tourism industry in the State, who shall be appointed by the Secretary of
Commerce and Community Development; and
(7) one person who has competed in the Olympic Games as an athlete,
who shall be appointed by the Special Olympics Vermont Board of Directors.
(c) Powers and duties. The Task Force shall perform the following duties:
(1) review the current process, criteria, and requirements for hosting the
Olympic Games;
(2) consult with Regional Planning Commissions during regional
planning to create land use maps that support requirements of the proposal set
forth in subdivisions (d)(2) and (3) of this section;
(3) prepare a proposal for hosting the Olympic Games in the State that
aligns with the goals of the Olympic Movement as set forth in the Olympic
Agenda 2020 and Olympic Agenda 2020+5 and includes regional development
plans of the State;
(4) present the proposal to the International Olympic Committee and the
U.S. National Olympic Committee; and
VT LEG #379900 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.367
2025 Page 5 of 6
(5) engage in ongoing dialogue about the feasibility of the proposal with
the International Olympic Committee and the U.S. Olympic and Paralympic
Committee.
(d) Proposal. The Task Force shall prepare a proposal for hosting the
Olympic Games in the State that:
(1) aligns with the goals of the Olympic Movement as set forth in the
Olympic Agenda 2020 and Olympic Agenda 2020+5;
(2) integrates to the extent possible regional and national development
plans;
(3) assesses regional strengths and identifies potential sites for
redevelopment to use for the colocation of athletic facilities, housing, and other
infrastructure that promotes the common good;
(4) supports State housing plans and meets projected needs for
permanent housing;
(5) promotes a vibrant and sustainable tourism industry as part of a
regenerative economy built on regional and local assets;
(6) fosters affordability and economic opportunity;
(7) improves transportation infrastructure between the State and
surrounding regions;
(8) invests in food security measures, ecological resilience,
environmental protection, and waste reduction;
VT LEG #379900 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.367
2025 Page 6 of 6
(9) promotes equity, inclusion, belonging, and social opportunity;
(10) promotes civic engagement;
(11) improves social determinants of health; and
(12) presents a long-term State vision that can be used as global model
for a sustainable, resilient, and equitable way of life on the planet.
(e) Reporting. The Task Force shall provide updates on its proposal work
to the General Assembly on or before December 31, 2025 and on or before
March 31, 2026, with a final written report due on or before December 31,
2026.
(f) Compensation.
(1) For attendance at meetings during adjournment of the General
Assembly, a legislative member of the Task Force shall be entitled to per diem
compensation and reimbursement of expenses pursuant to 2 V.S.A. § 23 for
not more than 20 meetings. These payments shall be made from monies
appropriated to the General Assembly.
(2) Other members of the Task Force shall be entitled to per diem
compensation and reimbursement of expenses as permitted under 32 V.S.A.
§ 1010 for not more than 20 meetings. These payments shall be made from
monies appropriated to the Task Force.
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #379900 v.1